Missouri, session 2026, HB1866.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 160.665, 170.315, 590.010, 590.100, and 590.205, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.665,
170.315, 590.010, 590.100, and 590.205, to read as follows:
160.665. 1. Any school district or charter school within the state may designate one
or more [elementary or secondary school teachers or administrators] employees of the
district or charter school as a school protection officer. The responsibilities and duties of a
school protection officer are voluntary and shall be in addition to the normal responsibilities
and duties of the [teacher or administrator] employee. Any compensation for additional
duties relating to service as a school protection officer shall be funded by the local school
district, with no state funds used for such purpose.
2. Any person designated by a school district or charter schoolas a school protection
officer shall be authorized to carry concealed firearms or a self-defense spray device in any
school in the district. A self-defense spray device shall mean any device that is capable of
carrying, and that ejects, releases, or emits, a nonlethal solution or projectile capable of
incapacitating a violent threat. The school protection officer shall not be permitted to allow
any firearm or device out of his or her personal control while that firearm or device is on
school property. Any school protection officer who violates this subsection may be removed
immediately from the classroom and subject to employment termination proceedings.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1866 2
3. A school protection officer has the same authority to detain or use force against any
person on school property as provided to any other person under chapter 563.
4. Upon detention of a person under subsection 3 of this section, the school protection
officer shall immediately notify a school administrator and a school resource officer, if such
officer is present at the school. If the person detained is a student then the parents or
guardians of the student shall also be immediately notified by a school administrator.
5. Any person detained by a school protection officer shall be turned over to a school
administrator or law enforcement officer as soon as practically possible and shall not be
detained by a school protection officer for more than one hour.
6. Any [teacher or administrator of an elementary or secondary school] employee of
a school district or charter school who seeks to be designated as a school protection officer
shall request such designation in writing, and submit it to the superintendent of the school
district or the executive director of the charter school governing board which employs
him or her [as a teacher or administrator]. Along with this request, any [teacher or
administrator] employee seeking to carry a concealed firearm on school property shall also
submit proof that he or she has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit, and all
[teachers and administrators] employees seeking the designation of school protection officer
shall submit a certificate of school protection officer training program completion from a
training program approved by the director of the department of public safety which
demonstrates that such person has successfully completed the training requirements
established by the POST commission under chapter 590 for school protection officers.
7. No school district or charter school may designate [a teacher or administrator] an
employee as a school protection officer unless such person has successfully completed a
school protection officer training program, which has been approved by the director of the
department of public safety. No school district or charter school shall allow a school
protection officer to carry a concealed firearm on school property unless the school protection
officer has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit.
8. Any school district or charter school that designates [a teacher or administrator]
an employee as a school protection officer shall, within thirty days, notify, in writing, the
director of the department of public safety of the designation, which shall include the
following:
(1) The full name, date of birth, and address of the officer;
(2) The name of the school district; and
(3) The date such person was designated as a school protection officer.


HCS HB 1866 3
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any identifying information
collected under the authority of this subsection shall not be considered public information and
shall not be subject to a request for public records made under chapter 610.
9. A school district or charter school may revoke the designation of a person as a
school protection officer for any reason and shall immediately notify the designated school
protection officer in writing of the revocation. The school district or charter school shall
also within thirty days of the revocation notify the director of the department of public safety
in writing of the revocation of the designation of such person as a school protection officer. A
person who has had the designation of school protection officer revoked has no right to appeal
the revocation decision.
10. The director of the department of public safety shall maintain a listing of all
persons designated by school districts and charter schools as school protection officers and
shall make this list available to all law enforcement agencies.
11. Before a school district or charter school may designate [a teacher or
administrator] an employee as a school protection officer, the school board or governing
board shall hold a public hearing on whether to allow such designation. Notice of the
hearing shall be published at least fifteen days before the date of the hearing in a newspaper
of general circulation within the city or county in which the school district or charter school
is located. The school board or governing board may determine at a closed meeting, as
"closed meeting" is defined under section 610.010, whether to authorize the designated school
protection officer to carry a concealed firearm or a self-defense spray device.
12. Each school district and charter school may consider implementing a school
protection officer program consistent with the provisions of this section. If
implementing a school protection officer program, the school board of each school
district and governing board of each charter school shall hold a public hearing and
determine by a vote at the hearing whether to implement such a program.
170.315. 1. (1) There is hereby established the "Active Shooter and Intruder
Response Training for Schools Program (ASIRT)".
(2) For each school year ending before July 1, [2026] 2027, each school district and
charter school [may] shall include in its teacher and school employee training a component
on how to properly respond to students who provide them with information about a
threatening situation and how to address situations in which there is a potentially dangerous
or armed intruder in the school. Training [may] shallalso include information and techniques
on how to address situations where an active shooter is present in the school or on school
property.
(3) For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, each school district
and charter school shall include in its teacher and school employee training components on:

HCS HB 1866 4
(a) How to properly respond to students who provide a teacher or school employee
with information about a threatening situation;
(b) How to address situations in which there is a potentially dangerous or armed
intruder in the school;
(c) Information and techniques on how to address situations where an active shooter
is present in the school or on school property;
(d) How to identify potential threats or safety hazards; and
(e) Protocols for emergencies in the school including, but not limited to:
a. Evacuations;
b. Severe weather;
c. Earthquakes;
d. Fire; and
e. Medical.
2. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, each school district
and charter school that elects to provide such training shall conduct the training on an annual
basis. The length of training shall be determined by the school district or charter school
electing to provide such training.
3. All school [personnel] employeesmay participate in a simulated active shooter and
intruder response drill conducted and led by law enforcement professionals or school safety
professionals. Each drill shall include an explanation of its purpose and a safety briefing.
4. All instructors for the program shall be certified by the department of public
safety's peace officers standards training commission.
5. School districts and charter schools may consult and collaborate with law
enforcement authorities, emergency response agencies, and other organizations and entities
trained to deal with active shooters or potentially dangerous or armed intruders.
6. Public schools shall actively foster an environment in which students feel
comfortable sharing information they have regarding a potentially threatening or dangerous
situation with a responsible adult. As part of each public school's efforts to actively foster
such environment, each public school shall annually provide age-appropriate information and
training on the Missouri state highway patrol's Courage2ReportMO (C2R) reporting
mechanism or its successor reporting mechanism.
7. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, each school district
and charter school shall hold an age-appropriate active shooter exercise in which students,
teachers, and other school employees participate in and practice the procedures for safety and
protection to be implemented under such conditions.
590.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms mean:

HCS HB 1866 5
(1) "Commission", when not obviously referring to the POST commission, means a
grant of authority to act as a peace officer;
(2) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of public safety or his or her
designated agent or representative;
(3) "Peace officer", a law enforcement officer of the state or any political subdivision
of the state with the power of arrest for a violation of the criminal code or declared or deemed
to be a peace officer by state statute;
(4) "POST commission", the peace officer standards and training commission;
(5) "Reserve peace officer", a peace officer who regularly works less than thirty hours
per week;
(6) "School protection officer", an [elementary or secondary school teacher or
administrator] employee of a school district or charter school who has been designated as a
school protection officer [by a school district].
590.100. 1. The director shall have cause to deny any application for a peace officer
license or entrance into a basic training course when the director has knowledge that would
constitute cause to discipline the applicant if the applicant were licensed.
2. The director shall have cause to deny any application for a peace officer
license or entrance into a basic training course when the applicant had a peace officer
license or certification that was revoked or surrendered.
3. When the director has knowledge of cause to deny an application pursuant to this
section, the director may grant the application subject to probation or may deny the
application. The director shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for such action
and of the right to appeal pursuant to this section.
[3.] 4. Any applicant aggrieved by a decision of the director pursuant to this section
may appeal within thirty days to the administrative hearing commission, which shall conduct
a hearing to determine whether the director has cause for denial, and which shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law on the matter. The administrative hearing commission
shall not consider the relative severity of the cause for denial or any rehabilitation of the
applicant or otherwise impinge upon the discretion of the director to determine whether to
grant the application subject to probation or deny the application when cause exists pursuant
to this section. Failure to submit a written request for a hearing to the administrative hearing
commission within thirty days after a decision of the director pursuant to this section shall
constitute a waiver of the right to appeal such decision.
[4.] 5. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission that cause for denial
exists, the director shall not be bound by any prior action on the matter and shall, within thirty
days, hold a hearing to determine whether to grant the application subject to probation or

HCS HB 1866 6
deny the application. If the licensee fails to appear at the director's hearing, this shall
constitute a waiver of the right to such hearing.
[5.] 6. The provisions of chapter 621 and any amendments thereto, except those
provisions or amendments that are in conflict with this chapter, shall apply to and govern the
proceedings of the administrative hearing commission pursuant to this section and the rights
and duties of the parties involved.
590.205. 1. The POST commission shall establish minimum standards for school
protection officer training instructors, training centers, and training programs.
2. The director shall develop and maintain a list of approved school protection officer
training instructors, training centers, and training programs. The director shall not place any
instructor, training center, or training program on its approved list unless such instructor,
training center, or training program meets all of the POST commission requirements under
this section and section 590.200. The director shall make this approved list available to every
school district in the state. The required training to become a school protection officer shall
be provided by those firearm instructors, private and public, who have successfully completed
a department of public safety POST certified law enforcement firearms instructor school.
3. Each person seeking entrance into a school protection officer training center or
training program shall submit a fingerprint card and authorization for a criminal history
background check to include the records of the Federal Bureau of Investigation to the training
center or training program where such person is seeking entrance. The training center or
training program shall cause a criminal history background check to be made and shall cause
the resulting report to be forwarded to the school district where the [elementary school
teacher or administrator] employee is seeking to be designated as a school protection officer.
4. No person shall be admitted to a school protection officer training center or
training program unless such person submits proof to the training center or training program
that he or she has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit.
5. A certificate of school protection officer training program completion may be
issued to any applicant by any approved school protection officer training instructor. On the
certificate of program completion the approved school protection officer training instructor
shall affirm that the individual receiving instruction has taken and passed a school protection
officer training program that meets the requirements of this section and section 590.200 and
indicate whether the individual has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit. The
instructor shall also provide a copy of such certificate to the director of the department of
public safety.

HCS HB 1866 7
6. The POST commission shall establish requirements for the continuing
education of all school protection officers. All school protection officers shall annually
receive twenty hours of firearms skill development training.
✔